North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-47 City Zoning

40-47-01.
Cities may zone — Application of regulations.

For the purpose of promoting health, safety, morals, or the general welfare of the community, the governing body of any city may, subject to the provisions of chapter 54-21.3, regulate and restrict the height, number of stories, and the size of buildings and other structures, the percentage of lot that may be occupied, the size of yards, courts, and other open spaces, the density of population, and the location and use of buildings, structures, and land for trade, industry, residence, or other purposes. The regulations may provide that a board of adjustment may determine and vary the application of the regulations in harmony with the regulations’ general purpose and intent and in accordance with general or specific rules contained in the regulations. The governing body of a city may establish institutional controls that address environmental concerns with the department of environmental quality as provided in section 23.1-10-16.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 1; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a1; S.L. 1929, ch. 181, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 40-4701; S.L. 1963, ch. 298, § 1; 1967, ch. 323, § 211; 1979, ch. 548, § 8; 2005, ch. 242, § 3; 2017, ch. 199, § 41, effective April 29, 2019; 2021, ch. 212, § 17, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2005 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 242, S.L. 2005 became effective March 31, 2005 pursuant to an emergency measure in section 5 of chapter 242, S.L. 2005.

Note.

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75. [Contingency met in 2019]

Section 20 of chapter 212, S.L. 2021, provides: “

RETROACTIVE APPLICATION.

This Act is retroactive in application.”

Cross-References.

Airport zoning, see ch. 2-04.

Group homes for developmentally disabled persons, zoning, see § 25-16-14.

Hospital, permission to establish in residence block of city required, see § 23-12-04.

Municipal zoning not affected by county zoning except by resolution of governing body, see § 11-33-20.

Regional planning and zoning commissions, see ch. 11-35.

40-47-01.1.
Extraterritorial zoning — Mediation — Determination by administrative law judge — Definition.

A city may, by ordinance, extend the application of a city’s zoning regulations to any quarter quarter section of unincorporated territory if a majority of the quarter quarter section is located within the following distance of the corporate limits of the city:

One mile [1.61 kilometers] if the city has a population of fewer than five thousand. A city that has exercised its authority under this subdivision has joint zoning and subdivision regulation jurisdiction from one-half mile [.80 kilometer] to one mile [1.61 kilometers] with the other political subdivision.

Two miles [3.22 kilometers] if the city has a population of five thousand or more, but fewer than twenty-five thousand. A city that has exercised its authority under this subdivision has joint zoning and subdivision regulation jurisdiction from one mile [1.61 kilometers] to two miles [3.22 kilometers] with the other political subdivision.

Four miles [6.44 kilometers] if the city has a population of twenty-five thousand or more. A city that has exercised its authority under this subdivision has joint zoning and subdivision regulation jurisdiction from two miles [3.22 kilometers] to four miles [6.44 kilometers] with the other political subdivision.

Any section or portion of a section of unincorporated territory within the area of joint zoning and subdivision regulation jurisdiction in which a plat or site plan has been presented before May 1, 2009, remains subject to the zoning designations and the regulations in place on May 1, 2009, unless changed as allowed under this section.

The extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction and authority to receive applications and issue permits under this section may be changed by written agreement between the city and the other political subdivision.

Joint jurisdiction is jurisdiction in which the other political subdivision has jurisdiction to receive applications and issue permits and impose administrative fees for applications and permits. In addition, under this jurisdiction the other political subdivision may adopt, modify, and enforce any zoning designation or regulation and approve any subdivision plat or regulation. For a decision to be final, the other political subdivision shall give written notice to the city. The city may request negotiation as to any decision made by the other political subdivision under the other political subdivision’s jurisdiction within thirty days of notice. If negotiation is not requested, the decision of the other political subdivision is final. If the governing body of the other political subdivision and the city do not come to an agreement as to the disputed zone or subdivision regulation within thirty days of request for negotiation, the dispute must be submitted to a committee for mediation. The committee must be comprised of one member appointed by the governor and two members of the governing body of the other political subdivision and two members of the governing body of the city. The governor’s appointee shall arrange and preside over the meeting and act as mediator at the meeting. A meeting may be continued until the dispute has been resolved or until the mediator determines that continued mediation is no longer worthwhile. If the mediation committee is unable to resolve the dispute to the satisfaction of the governing bodies, the dispute must be resolved by the board of county commissioners.

Notwithstanding subsection 2, in any section or portion of a section of unincorporated territory in which there would otherwise be joint jurisdiction and in which a plat or site plan has been presented before May 1, 2009, the city has jurisdiction to receive applications and issue permits and impose administrative fees for applications and permits relating to zoning and subdivision regulation. In addition, under this jurisdiction the city may adopt, modify, and enforce any zoning designation or regulation and approve any subdivision plat or regulation. For a decision of the city made after May 1, 2009, to be final, the city shall give written notice of the decision of the governing body of the political subdivision that would otherwise have jurisdiction. The governing body may request negotiation as to any decision made by the city under the city’s jurisdiction within thirty days of notice. If negotiation is not requested, the decision of the city is final. If the city and governing body of the political subdivision that would otherwise have jurisdiction do not come to an agreement as to the disputed zoning or subdivision regulation within thirty days of the request for negotiation, the dispute must be submitted to a committee for mediation. The committee must be comprised of one member appointed by the governor and two members of the governing body of the other political subdivision and two members of the governing body of the city. The governor’s appointee shall arrange and preside over the meeting and act as mediator at the meeting. A meeting may be continued until the dispute has been resolved or until the mediator determines that continued mediation is no longer worthwhile. If the mediation committee is unable to resolve the dispute to the satisfaction of the governing bodies, the dispute must be resolved by the board of county commissioners.

If a quarter quarter section line divides a platted lot and the majority of that platted lot lies within the quarter quarter section, a city may apply its extraterritorial zoning authority to the remainder of that platted lot. If the majority of the platted lot lies outside the quarter quarter section, the city may not apply its extraterritorial zoning authority to any of that platted lot.

A city exercising its extraterritorial zoning authority shall hold a zoning transition meeting if the territory to be extraterritorially zoned is currently zoned. The city’s zoning or planning commission shall provide at least fourteen days’ notice of the meeting to the zoning board or boards of all political subdivisions losing their partial zoning authority. The purpose of the zoning transition meeting is to review existing zoning rules, regulations, and restrictions currently in place in the territory to be extraterritorially zoned and to plan for an orderly transition. The zoning transition meeting must take place before the city’s adoption of an ordinance exercising extraterritorial zoning.

If two or more cities have boundaries at a distance where there is an overlap of extraterritorial zoning authority under this section, the governing bodies of the cities may enter into an agreement regarding the extraterritorial zoning authority of each city. The agreement must be for a specific term and is binding upon the cities unless the governing bodies of the cities agree to amend or rescind the agreement or unless determined otherwise by an administrative law judge in accordance with this chapter. If a dispute arises concerning the extraterritorial zoning authority of a city and the governing bodies of the cities involved fail to resolve the dispute, the dispute must be submitted to a committee for mediation. The committee must be comprised of one member appointed by the governor, one member of the governing body of each city, and one member of the planning commission of each city who resides outside the corporate city limits. The governor’s appointee shall arrange and preside over the meeting and act as mediator at the meeting. A meeting may be continued until the dispute has been resolved or until the mediator determines that continued mediation is no longer worthwhile.

If the mediation committee is unable to resolve the dispute to the satisfaction of the governing bodies of all the cities involved, the governing body of any of the cities may petition the office of administrative hearings to appoint an administrative law judge to determine the extraterritorial zoning authority of the cities in the disputed area. A hearing may not be held until after at least two weeks’ written notice has been given to the governing bodies of the cities involved in the dispute. At the hearing, the governor’s appointee who mediated the meetings under subsection 6 shall provide information to the administrative law judge on the dispute between the cities involved and any proposed resolutions or recommendations made by a majority of the committee members. Any resident of, or person owning property in, a city involved in the dispute or the unincorporated territory that is the subject of the proposed extraterritorial zoning, a representative of such a resident or property owner, and any representative of a city involved, may appear at the hearing and present evidence on any matter to be determined by the administrative law judge. A decision by the administrative law judge is binding upon all the cities involved in the dispute and remains effective until the governing bodies of the cities agree to a change in the zoning authority of the cities. The governing body of a city may request a review of a decision of an administrative law judge due to changed circumstances at any time ten years after the decision has become final. An administrative law judge shall consider the following factors in making a decision under this subsection:

The proportional extraterritorial zoning authority of the cities involved in the dispute;

The proximity of the land in dispute to the corporate limits of each city involved;

The proximity of the land in dispute to developed property in the cities involved;

Whether any of the cities has exercised extraterritorial zoning authority over the disputed land;

Whether natural boundaries such as rivers, lakes, highways, or other physical characteristics affecting the land are present;

The growth pattern of the cities involved in the dispute; and

Any other factor determined to be relevant by the administrative law judge.

For purposes of this section, the population of a city must be determined by the last official regular or special federal census. If a city has incorporated after a census, the population of the city must be determined by a census taken in accordance with chapter 40-22.

When a portion of the city is attached to the bulk of the city by a strip of land less than one hundred feet [30.48 meters] wide, that portion and strip of land must be disregarded when determining the extraterritorial zoning limits of the city. This subsection does not affect the ability of a city to zone land within its city limits.

For the purposes of this section, a section or a quarter quarter section is as determined in the manner provided by 2 Stat. 313 [43 U.S.C. 752]. When appropriate, the phrase “quarter quarter section” refers to the equivalent government lot.

As used in this section, “other political subdivision” means a political subdivision, not including another city, which would otherwise have zoning or subdivision regulation jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 385, § 2; 1981, ch. 421, § 1; 1997, ch. 354, § 1; 1999, ch. 367, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 11; 2007, ch. 351, § 1; 2009, ch. 350, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 350, S.L. 2009 became effective May 5, 2009, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 3 of chapter 350, S.L. 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 351, S.L. 2007 is effective through July 31, 2009, and after that date is ineffective, pursuant to section 6 of chapter 351, S.L. 2007.

Note.

S.L. 2009, ch. 350, § 2 provides:

“LEGISLATIVE INTENT.

It is the intent of the sixty-first legislative assembly that land use regulations under consideration by local governments be readily available to the public. Local governments are encouraged to jointly discuss their land use regulations and consider the cumulative impact of local regulations.”

S.L. 2007, ch. 351, § 5 provides:

“APPLICATION.

Any extraterritorial zoning regulation in effect before May 1, 2007, which extends beyond the extraterritorial zoning authority provided by this Act is not affected by the reduction in the extraterritorial zoning limits in section 1 of this Act” [which amended this section].

Cross-References.

Zoning of territory adjacent to city, see §§ 11-35-02, 40-48-18.

40-47-01.2.
Agreements to not oppose annexation void.

The zoning commission or governing body may not require as a condition of approval of a request to amend or modify a zoning regulation the execution of an agreement by the owner of the property requesting the amendment or modification stating that the owner will not oppose the annexation of the property by the municipality. This section does not apply to property located within one quarter mile [.40 kilometer] of the municipality’s corporate limits or to an agreement that contains a provision whereby the municipality agrees to provide a municipal service or services before the annexation. Any agreement entered in violation of this section is void.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 355, § 1.

Note

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under
S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75. [Contingency met in 2019]

40-47-01.3
Extraterritorial zoning — Limitation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a city that exercises extraterritorial jurisdiction under this chapter may not impose building permit fees on any section of unincorporated territory which are higher than the building permit fees within the city exercising the jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 339, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

40-47-02.
Division of city into districts to carry out regulations.

The governing body may divide the city into districts of such number, shape, and area as may be deemed best suited to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and may regulate and restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, or use of buildings, structures, or land within such districts. All regulations shall be uniform for each class or kind of buildings throughout each district, but the regulations in one district may differ from those in other districts.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 2; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a2; R.C. 1943, § 40-4702.

40-47-03.
Regulation for zoning made for what purposes.

The regulations provided for in this chapter shall be made in accordance with a comprehensive plan and shall be designed to:

Lessen congestion in the streets;

Provide for emergency management. “Emergency management” means a comprehensive integrated system at all levels of government and in the private sector which provides for the development and maintenance of an effective capability to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and recover from known and unforeseen hazards or situations, caused by an act of nature or man, which may threaten, injure, damage, or destroy lives, property, or our environment;

Promote health and the general welfare;

Provide adequate light and air;

Prevent the overcrowding of land;

Avoid undue concentration of population; and

Facilitate adequate provisions for transportation, water, sewage, schools, parks, and other public requirements.

The regulations shall be made with reasonable consideration as to the character of each district and its peculiar suitability for particular uses with a view to conserving the value of buildings and encouraging the most appropriate use of land throughout the city. The comprehensive plan shall be a statement in documented text setting forth explicit goals, objectives, policies, and standards of the jurisdiction to guide public and private development within its control.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 3; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a3; R.C. 1943, § 40-4703; S.L. 1981, ch. 148, § 2; 1999, ch. 542, § 3.

40-47-04.
Determining and enforcing regulations — Public hearing and notice thereof — Publication of regulations, restrictions, and boundaries.

The governing body of a city which uses zoning regulations shall provide for the manner in which the regulations and restrictions must be established, enforced, or supplemented, and for the manner in which the boundaries of the districts must be established and from time to time changed. A copy of each proposed regulation, restriction, or boundary must be filed with the city auditor. No regulation, restriction, or boundary may become effective until after a public hearing at which parties in interest and citizens shall have an opportunity to be heard. Notice of the hearing must be published once a week for two successive weeks before the time set for the hearing in the official newspaper of the city. The notice must contain the following items:

The time and place of the hearing.

A description of any property involved in any zoning change, by street address if streets have been platted or designated in the area affected.

A description of the nature, scope, and purpose of the proposed regulation, restriction, or boundary.

A statement of the times at which it will be available to the public for inspection and copying at the office of the city auditor.

Upon establishment of any regulation, restriction, or boundary hereunder, the governing body of a city shall file a certified copy thereof with the city auditor and shall cause notice of the same to be published in the official newspaper of the city. The notice must describe the nature, scope, and purpose of the regulation, restriction, or boundary and must state the times at which it will be available to the public for inspection and copying at the office of the city auditor.

The governing body of a city, a city zoning commission, and a board of adjustment shall state the grounds upon which any request for a zoning amendment or variance is approved or disapproved, and written findings upon which the decision is based must be included within the records of the governing body, commission, or board.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 4; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a4; R.C. 1943, § 40-4704; S.L. 1971, ch. 417, § 1; 1977, ch. 110, § 3; 2007, ch. 107, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 107, S.L. 2007 became effective August 1, 2007.

40-47-05.
Amendments to or repeals of zoning regulations — Protest — Required vote for passage.

Regulations, restrictions, and boundaries may be amended, supplemented, changed, modified, or repealed from time to time. If a protest against a change, supplement, modification, amendment, or repeal is signed by the owners of twenty percent or more:

Of the area of the lots included in such proposed change; or

Of the area adjacent, extending one hundred fifty feet [45.72 meters] from the area to be changed, excluding the width of streets,

the amendment shall not become effective except by the favorable vote of three-fourths of all the members of the governing body of the city. The provisions of section 40-47-04 relating to public hearings, official notice, and publication of regulations, restrictions, and boundaries shall apply equally to all changes or amendments provided in this section; provided, that protests in writing must be filed with the city auditor prior to the time set for the hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 5; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a5; R.C. 1943, § 40-4705; S.L. 1953, ch. 260, § 1; 1957, ch. 290, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 40-4705; S.L. 1977, ch. 110, § 4.

40-47-06.
Zoning commission — Appointment — Duties — Preliminary and final report.

The governing body of a city desiring to avail itself of the powers conferred by this chapter shall appoint a commission, to be known as the zoning commission, to recommend the boundaries of the various original districts and appropriate regulations to be enforced therein. In addition to the members appointed by the city, the zoning commission shall include at least one person residing outside of the corporate limits of a city having a population of less than five thousand, two persons residing outside the corporate limits of a city having a population of five thousand or more, but less than twenty-five thousand, or three persons residing outside the corporate limits of a city having a population of twenty-five thousand or more if zoning authority is exercised pursuant to section 40-47-01.1. Such persons shall be appointed by the board or boards of county commissioners of the county or counties within which such zoning authority is to be exercised and shall reside within the territorial limits of the zoning regulation authority exercised by the city, if such persons are available and will serve on the zoning commission. Of the members of the commission appointed by a board or boards of county commissioners pursuant to this section, the first member appointed shall hold office for five years, the second member appointed shall hold office for three years, and the third member appointed shall hold office for one year. Thereafter, the members shall be appointed for terms of five years. Such commission shall make a preliminary report and hold public hearings thereon before submitting its final report. The governing body shall not hold its public hearings or take action until it has received the final report of the zoning commission. If a city has a planning commission, it may be appointed as the zoning commission.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 6; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a6; R.C. 1943, § 40-4706; S.L. 1975, ch. 385, § 3; 2007, ch. 351, § 2.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 351, S.L. 2007 is effective through July 31, 2009, and after that date is ineffective, pursuant to section 6 of chapter 351, S.L. 2007.

40-47-07.
Board of adjustment — Members — Term — Hear and decide appeals and review orders.

The governing body may provide for the appointment of a board of adjustment consisting of five members, each member to be appointed for a term of three years. The board of adjustment shall hear and decide appeals from and shall review any order, requirement, decision, or determination made by an administrative official charged with the enforcement of any ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter. It shall hear and decide all matters referred to it or upon which it is required to pass under any such ordinance. The concurring vote of four members of the board shall be necessary to reverse any order, requirement, decision, or determination of any such administrative official or to decide in favor of the applicant any matter upon which it is required to pass under any such ordinance, or to effect any variation in such ordinance. Upon request of the board, the governing body shall have the right to appoint an alternate member of said board of adjustment, who shall sit as an active member when and if a member of said board is unable to serve at any hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 7; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a7; R.C. 1943, § 40-4707; S.L. 1971, ch. 418, § 1.

40-47-08.
Appeal to board of adjustment — Taking — Filing — Time — Transmitting record.

An appeal to the board of adjustment may be taken by any person aggrieved or by any officer, department, board, or bureau of the city. The appeal shall be taken within the time prescribed by rule of the board by filing with the officer from whom the appeal is taken and with the board of adjustment a notice of appeal, specifying the grounds thereof. The officer from whom the appeal is taken forthwith shall transmit to the board of adjustment all the papers constituting the record upon which the action appealed from was taken.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 7; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a7; R.C. 1943, § 40-4708.

40-47-09.
Hearing of appeal by board of adjustment — Notice — Authority of board — Items taken into consideration by board.

The board of adjustment shall fix a reasonable time for the hearing of the appeal and shall give due notice thereof to the parties. It shall decide the appeal within a reasonable time. Upon the hearing, any party may appear in person or by agent or by attorney. The board may reverse or affirm, in whole or in part, or may modify, the order, requirement, decision, or determination appealed from, and shall make such order, requirement, decision, or determination as in its opinion ought to be made in the premises, and to that end, the board shall have all the powers of the officer from whom the appeal is taken. If there is practical difficulty or unnecessary hardship in the way of carrying out the strict letter of the ordinance, the board, in passing upon an appeal, may vary or modify any of the regulations or provisions of the ordinance relating to the use, construction, or alteration of buildings or structures or the uses of land so that the spirit of the ordinance shall be observed, public safety and welfare secured, and substantial justice done.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 7; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a7; R.C. 1943, § 40-4709.

40-47-10.
Effect of appeal to board of adjustment — Restraining order.

An appeal to the board of adjustment stays all proceedings in furtherance of the action appealed from unless the officer from whom the appeal is taken certifies to the board of adjustment after the notice of appeal shall have been filed with the officer that by reason of facts stated in the certificate a stay, in the officer’s opinion, would cause imminent peril to life or property. In such a case, proceedings shall not be stayed except by a restraining order which may be granted by the board of adjustment or by a court of record on application and on due cause shown after notice to the officer from whom the appeal is taken.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 7; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a7; R.C. 1943, § 40-4710.

40-47-11.
Determination of board of adjustment reviewable.

Every decision of the board of adjustment is subject to review in the following manner:

A decision of the board of adjustment may be appealed to the governing body of the city by either the aggrieved applicant or by any officer, department, board, or bureau of the city. The appeal must be filed with the city auditor within fifteen days after notice of the decision of the board of adjustment. The governing body of the city shall fix a time, within thirty days, for the hearing of the appeal and shall give due notice of the hearing to the parties. The governing body of the city shall decide the appeal within a reasonable time. Any party may appear in person or by agent or by attorney at the hearing of the governing body on the appeal. The governing body of the city may reverse or affirm the decision of the board of adjustment, in whole or in part, or may modify the order, decision, or determination appealed.

A decision of the governing body of the city on an appeal from a decision of the board of adjustment may be appealed to the district court in the manner provided in section 28-34-01.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 7; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a7; R.C. 1943, § 40-4711; S.L. 1985, ch. 466, § 1; 1995, ch. 315, § 2.

40-47-12.
Instituting action to restrain, correct, or abate violations.

If any building or structure is erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, repaired, converted, or maintained, or if any building, structure, or land is used in violation of this chapter or of any ordinance or other regulation made under the authority conferred by this chapter, the proper local authorities of the city, in addition to other remedies, may institute any appropriate action or proceeding:

To prevent such unlawful erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, conversion, maintenance, or use;

To restrain, correct, or abate such violation;

To prevent the occupancy of the building, structure, or land; or

To prevent any illegal act, conduct, business, or use in or about such premises.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 8; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a8; R.C. 1943, § 40-4712.

40-47-13.
Conflict between regulations adopted under this chapter and other laws, ordinances, or regulations.

If the regulations made under the authority of this chapter require a greater width or size of yards or courts, or require a lower height of building or a lesser number of stories, or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required in any other statute or local ordinance or regulation, the provisions of the regulations made under the authority of this chapter shall govern. If the provisions of any other statute or local ordinance or regulation require a greater width or size of yards or courts, or require a lower height of building or a lesser number of stories, or require a greater percentage of lot to be left unoccupied, or impose other higher standards than are required by the regulations made under the authority of this chapter, the provisions of such statute or local ordinance shall govern.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 175, § 9; C.L. 1913, 1925 Supp., § 3756a9; R.C. 1943, § 40-4713.